Illinois, session 104th, HB1239.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Identification Card Act is amended 5by adding Section 18 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 335/18 new)7    Sec. 18. Blood type on identification card. The Secretary 8of State shall provide an option to an applicant for an 9original, reissued, or renewed identification card to indicate 10the applicant's blood type. If an applicant chooses to 11indicate the applicant's blood type, the Secretary of State 12shall print the identified blood type on the applicant's 13identification card. Nothing in this Section shall be 14construed to require the Secretary of State to verify an 15applicant's blood type designation. 16    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 17Section 6-123 as follows: 18    (625 ILCS 5/6-123 new)19    Sec. 6-123. Blood type of driver's license; permit. The 20Secretary of State shall provide an option to an applicant for 21an original, reissued, or renewed driver's license or driver's   HB1239- 2 -LRB104 06192 LNS 16227 b1permit to indicate the applicant's blood type. If an applicant 2chooses to indicate the applicant's blood type, the Secretary 3of State shall print the designated blood type on the 4applicant's driver's license or driver's permit. Nothing in 5this Section shall be construed to require the Secretary to 6verify an applicant's blood type designation.